Utah statutes.
65A-8-207.   Division to administer Wildland Fire Suppression Fund --
Rulemaking -- Procedures.
(1)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules to
administer the Wildland Fire Suppression Fund, including rules:
(a)  requiring documentation for:
(i)  the number of acres of privately or county-owned land in the
unincorporated area of a participating county; and
(ii)  an acre or real property exempt in Subsection 65A-8-205(2)(b);
(b)  describing the method or formula for determining:
(i)  normal fire suppression costs; and
(ii)  equity payments required by Section 65A-8-205; and
(c)  specifying fire suppression and presuppression costs that may be paid
with disbursements from the fund.
(2)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, the division shall determine whether an acre or
real property is eligible for the exemption provided in Subsection
65A-8-205(2)(b).
